Wisconsin, session 2025, SB560.
do enact as follows:SB560,11Section 1. 97.50 of the statutes is created to read:SB560,2,3297.50 Labeling food products that contain cultured animal cells or 3tissue. (1) In this section:SB560,2,44(a) “Animal” means a mammal, a bird, a reptile, an amphibian, or a mollusk.SB560,2,65(b) “Lab-grown meat” means cultured animal cells or cultured animal tissue 6derived from cultured animal cells.SB560,2,87(2) No person may sell or offer for sale a packaged food product that contains 8lab-grown meat unless all of the following apply:SB560,2,119(a) The packaged food product is labeled with the phrase “lab-grown meat” in 10type or lettering at least as large as any other type or lettering on the packaged food 11product’s label in a color of print that clearly contrasts with its background.SB560,2,1312(b) The packaged food product’s label includes a complete and accurate list of 13the ingredients contained in the enclosed food product. SB560,2,1714(c) If there is more than one separately packaged component enclosed in the 15packaged food product, each separately packaged component that contains lab-16grown meat bears the phrase “lab-grown meat” in type or lettering not smaller than 1720-point type.SB560,2,2018(3) No person may sell or offer for sale at a public eating place a food product 19that contains lab-grown meat as a substitute for meat unless such food product is 20ordered by the customer.SB560,3,321(4) No person may serve a food product that contains lab-grown meat as a 22substitute for meat to students, patients, or inmates of any state institutions, except 1if ordered by the institution superintendent when necessary for the health of a 2specific patient or inmate, if directed by the physician in charge of the patient or 3inmate.SB560,3,74(5) A person that violates this section may be fined not less than $100 nor 5more than $500 or imprisoned for not more than 3 months, or both, for a first 6offense and may be fined not less than $500 nor more than $1,000 or imprisoned for 7not less than 6 months nor more than one year, or both, for each subsequent offense.SB560,28Section 2. Effective date.SB560,3,99(1) This act takes effect on January 1, 2027.SB560,3,1010